test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-emandoijakseh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - emändöijäkseh: # Verb 'syntyä, ilmaantua' - full paradigm
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg1: emändöimmös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg2: emändöittös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg3: [emändöih, emändöihes]
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl1: emändöimmökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl2: emändöittökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl3: emändöitähes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcSg: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl1: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl2: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl3: emändöitähes

     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg1: emändöimmös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg2: emändöittös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg3: [emändöih, emändöihes]
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl1: emändöimmökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl2: emändöittökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl3: emändöitihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcSg: emändöinnyhes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl1: emändöinnyhes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl2: emändöinnyhes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl3: emändöityhes

     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg1: emändöizimmös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg2: emändöizittös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg3: emändöizihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl1: emändöizimmökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl2: emändöizittökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl3: emändöitäzihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcSg: emändöizihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl1: emändöizihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl2: emändöizihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl3: emändöitäzihes

     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg1: emändöinnyzimmös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg2: emändöinnyzittös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg3: emändöinnyzihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl1: emändöinnyzimmökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl2: emändöinnyzittökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl3: emändöitännyzihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcSg: emändöinnyzihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl1: emändöinnyzihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl2: emändöinnyzihes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl3: emändöitännyzihes

     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+RcSg1: emändöinnemmös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+RcSg2: emändöinnettös
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+RcSg3: emändöinnehes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+RcPl1: emändöinnemmökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+RcPl2: emändöinnettökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+RcPl3: emändöitännehes
## Thit looks like it ought to be _emändöitänehes_
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcSg: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcPl1: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcPl2: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Pot+ConNeg+RcPl3: emändöitänehes


     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+RcSg2: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+RcSg3: emändöikkähes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+RcPl1: emändöikkiämmökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+RcPl2: emändöikkiättökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+RcPl3: emändöitähes
## There must be some Conneg forms as well
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+ConNeg+RcSg2: emändöi
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+ConNeg+RcSg3: emändöikkähes
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+ConNeg+RcPl2: emändöikkiättökseh
     emändöijäkseh+V+Imprt+ConNeg+RcPl3: emändöitähes

     emändöijäkseh+V+RcPrfPrc: emändöityhes
